Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 282.18, subsection 12, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12. a. A pupil participating in open enrollment for purposes of receiving educational instruction and course content primarily over the internet in accordance with section 256.7, subsection 32 , may participate in any cocurricular or extracurricular activities offered to children in the pupilâs grade or group , and sponsored by the district of residence , under the same conditions and requirements as the pupils enrolled in the district of residence , if the school district attendance center providing the educational instruction and course content primarily over the internet does not sponsor such cocurricular or extracurricular activities . b. The pupil may participate in not more than two cocurricular or extracurricular activities during a school year per academic term unless the resident district approves the studentâs pupilâs participation in additional activities. Senate File 176, p. 2 c. The student pupil shall comply with the eligibility, conduct, and other requirements relating to the activity that are established by the district of residence for any student pupil who applies to participate or who is participating in the activity. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 176, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor